Montana, session 2025, SB548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 35-7-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"35-7-102. Definitions. Unless the context requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Appointment of agent" means a statement appointing an agent for service of process filed by:
(a) a domestic or foreign unincorporated nonprofit association; or
(b) a domestic entity that is not a filing entity or a nonqualified foreign entity under 35-7-112.
(2) "Commercial registered agent" means an individual or a domestic or foreign entity listed under
35-7-106.
(3) "Domestic entity" means an entity whose internal affairs are governed by the law of this state.
(4) "Entity" means a person that has a separate legal existence or has the power to acquire an
interest in real property in its own name other than:
(a) an individual;
(b) a testamentary, inter vivos, or charitable trust, with the exception of a business trust, statutory
trust, or similar trust;
(c) an association or relationship that is not a partnership by reason of 35-10-202(3) or a similar
provision of the law of any other jurisdiction;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1
(d) a decedent's estate; or
(e) a public corporation, government, governmental subdivision, agency, instrumentality, or quasi-
governmental instrumentality.
(5) "Filing entity" means an entity that is created by the filing of a public organic document.
(6) "Foreign agent" means an individual, regardless of citizenship or residence status, who acts on
behalf of a foreign government, foreign corporation, or foreign educational institution and who:
(a) directly or indirectly advocates for or against public policy matters;
(b) directly or indirectly advocates for or against the nomination, the appointment, or the election of
a candidate for a public office or a government position; or
(c) seeks to establish or sever formal relationships between a public entity in the state and a
foreign government, foreign corporation, or foreign educational institution.
(7) "Foreign corporation" means any for-profit, nonprofit, or charitable institution, association, or
nongovernment organization incorporated, chartered, domiciled, funded by, or controlled by individuals or
entities located outside the boundaries of the United States.
(6)(8) (a) "Foreign entity" means an entity other than a domestic entity.
(b) The term does not include a foreign agent as defined in this section.
(9) "Foreign government" means a government other than the federal government of the United
States or the government of a state, political subdivision of a state, territory, federally recognized Indian tribe, or
possession of the United States.
(10) "Foreign educational institution" means a research or educational institution or entity located
outside the boundaries of the United States.
(7)(11) "Foreign qualification document" means an application for a certificate of authority or other
foreign qualification filing with the secretary of state by a foreign entity.
(8)(12) "Governance interest" means the right under the organic law or organic rules of an entity, other
than as a governor, agent, assignee, or proxy, to:
(a) receive or demand access to information concerning or to the books and records of the entity;
(b) vote for the election of the governors of the entity; or
(c) receive notice of or vote on any or all issues involving the internal affairs of the entity.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1
(9)(13) "Governor" means a person by or under whose authority the powers of an entity are exercised
and under whose direction the business and affairs of the entity are managed pursuant to the organic law and
organic rules of the entity.
(10)(14)"Interest" means:
(a) a governance interest in an unincorporated entity;
(b) a transferable interest in an unincorporated entity; or
(c) a share or membership in a corporation.
(11)(15)"Interest holder" means a direct holder of an interest.
(12)(16)"Jurisdiction of organization", with respect to an entity, means the jurisdiction whose law
includes the organic law of the entity.
(13)(17)"Noncommercial registered agent" means a person that is not listed as a commercial registered
agent under 35-7-106 and that is an individual or a domestic or foreign entity that serves in this state as the
agent for service of process of an entity.
(14)(18)"Nonqualified foreign entity" means a foreign entity that is not authorized to transact business in
this state pursuant to a filing with the secretary of state.
(15)(19)"Nonresident LLP statement" means:
(a) a statement of qualification of a domestic limited liability partnership that does not have an
office in this state; or
(b) a statement of foreign qualification of a foreign limited liability partnership that does not have an
office in this state.
(16)(20)"Organic law" means the statutes, if any, other than this chapter, governing the internal affairs
of an entity.
(17)(21)"Organic rules" means the public organic document and private organic rules of an entity.
(18)(22)"Person" means an individual, corporation, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company,
business or similar trust, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, governmental subdivision,
agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(19)(23)"Private organic rules" mean the rules, whether or not in a record, that govern the internal
affairs of an entity, are binding on all of its interest holders, and are not part of its public organic document, if
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1
any.
(20)(24)"Public organic document" means the public record that when filed creates an entity and any
amendment to or restatement of that record.
(25) "Public policy matter" means any legislation, law, pending regulation, regulation, memorandum
of understanding, services agreement, request for proposal, contract, or lawsuit involving the state, a political
subdivision of the state, or a public education institution in the state.
(21)(26)"Qualified foreign entity" means a foreign entity that is authorized to transact business in this
state pursuant to a filing with the secretary of state.
(22)(27)"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an
electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(23)(28)"Registered agent" means a commercial registered agent or a noncommercial registered agent.
(24)(29)"Registered agent filing" means:
(a) the public organic document of a domestic filing entity;
(b) a nonresident LLP statement;
(c) a foreign qualification document; or
(d) an appointment of agent.
(25)(30)"Represented entity" means:
(a) a domestic filing entity;
(b) a domestic or qualified foreign limited liability partnership that does not have an office in this
state;
(c) a qualified foreign entity;
(d) a domestic or foreign unincorporated nonprofit association for which an appointment of agent
has been filed;
(e) a domestic entity that is not a filing entity for which an appointment of agent has been filed; or
(f) a nonqualified foreign entity for which an appointment of agent has been filed.
(26)(31)"Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:
(a) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1
(27)(32)"Transferable interest" means the right under an entity's organic law to receive distributions
from the entity.
(28)(33)"Type", with respect to an entity, means a generic form of entity:
(a) recognized at common law; or
(b) organized under an organic law, whether or not some entities organized under that organic law
are subject to provisions of that law that create different categories of the form of entity."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Foreign agent registration requirement -- fee -- monthly report --
exemption. (1) An individual present in the state who represents or transacts business on behalf of a foreign
government, foreign corporation, or foreign educational institution while interacting with an official or employee
of the state, a political subdivision of the state, or a public education institution located within the state shall
register as a foreign agent with the office of the secretary of state.
(2) The filing fee is $150. A fee collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state
general fund.
(3) The filing disclosing an individual as a foreign agent must include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) the full legal name of the individual as well as any names commonly used by the individual;
(b) the legal or residential address of the individual, the business address of the individual, and the
address of any residence used by the individual while operating in the state if different from the individual's
legal, residential, or business address;
(c) copies of all financial transactions, contracts, and agreements with the represented foreign
government, foreign corporation, or foreign educational institution;
(d) the identification of the foreign government, foreign corporation, or foreign educational
institution the individual represents, whether or not the individual is compensated financially for the work; and
(e) if the foreign government, foreign corporation, or foreign educational institution represented by
the individual is from a country determined to be a foreign adversary pursuant to 15 CFR 791.4(a) or is
headquartered, domiciled, or located within one of those countries, a signed statement by the individual
acknowledging that the individual is registering as a foreign agent acting on behalf of a nation hostile to the
interests of the United States.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1
(4) On a monthly basis for as long as an individual is registered as a foreign agent, the foreign
agent shall file a monthly report with the office of the secretary of state consisting of the following information:
(a) the identity of and the number of times the individual met with a government employee or
official of the state or any political subdivision or public education institution in the state;
(b) the amount of any funds expended on meetings with an employee or official described in
subsection (4)(a);
(c) any educational efforts on a public policy matter or advocacy efforts undertaken for or against a
public policy matter;
(d) the amount of any contributions to a candidate for public office or to a political party; and
(e) the value and the type of any funds, gifts, or nonmonetary compensation received by the
individual while serving as a foreign agent.
(5) The office of the secretary of state shall make public on its website the reports filed by any
foreign agent operating within this state.
(6) Registration as a foreign agent is not required if the individual:
(a) is an official of or an employee of a foreign government and is conducting official business
coordinated through the embassy of the foreign government for the purpose of diplomatic meetings; or
(b) is providing legal representation for a registered foreign agent in a civil or criminal legal matter.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Penalties -- whistleblower hotline. (1) An individual who is required to
register as a foreign agent pursuant to [section 2] and who fails to do so within 5 business days shall be fined
not less than $25,000 for each violation. An individual who is more than 10 business days late in filing the
required monthly report as prescribed in [section 2] shall be fined not less than $15,000 for each late or missing
report.
(2) An individual who is found to have falsified or knowingly filed incomplete or inaccurate
information in a report under [section 2] shall be fined not less than $100,000.
(3) The attorney general and any county prosecutor in the state have the authority to prosecute
violations of [section 2].
(4) (a) The office of the secretary of state shall establish a whistleblower hotline that allows an
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1
individual with information about violations of [section 2] to report the violations without being identified to the
public or to the individual about whom the whistleblower is reporting. Any information collected from a
whistleblower must be shared with the office of the attorney general and the county prosecutor for the county in
which the individual who is alleged to have violated [section 2] resides. The identity of the whistleblower must
be shared with the office of the attorney general and the county prosecutor.
(b) The decision to prosecute a violation of [section 2] remains the sole jurisdiction of the attorney
general or prosecutor of the county in which the individual alleged to have violated [section 2] resides.
(c) If a whistleblower's information leads to a successful conviction for a violation of [section 2], the
whistleblower must receive a compensation payment equal to 50% of the total fines resulting from the
conviction.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Disqualification from economic development incentives. (1) A
corporation doing business in the state must be disqualified from receiving economic development incentives if
the corporation is a foreign corporation from one of the countries specified in subsection (2) or if an individual,
government, or corporation from one of the countries in subsection (2) has a 5% or greater ownership stake in
the corporation, even if the corporation is incorporated, chartered, or domiciled in the United States or any other
nation.
(2) This section applies to the countries determined to be foreign adversaries pursuant to 15 CFR
791.4(a).
(3) As used in this section, "economic development incentive" means a tax credit, tax deduction,
grant, or loan offered on a conditional basis by the state or a political subdivision of the state to a corporation
doing businesses in the state.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. (1) [Sections 2 and 3] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 35, chapter 7, part 1, and the provisions of Title 35, chapter 7, part 1, apply
to [sections 2 and 3].
(2) [Section 4] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 17, chapter 8, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 17, chapter 8, part 1, apply to [section 4].
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 548.1

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 548